New York, session 2025-2026, A1048.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 615 of the tax law is amended by 2 adding a new paragraph 2-a to read as follows: 3 (2-a) for taxable years beginning on or after January first, two thou- 4 sand twenty-five, an amount equal to the amount expended by a taxpayer 5 for qualifying medical expenses as determined pursuant to this para- 6 graph. Qualifying medical expenses shall be calculated by (a) multiply- 7 ing a taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income by two and one-half 8 percent; and then (b) subtracting the amount determined in subparagraph 9 (a) of this paragraph from the total amount expended by a taxpayer 10 during the tax year for all medical related expenses including premiums 11 paid for health and accident insurance, and long term care insurance; 12 and 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00389-01-5